lt-LT: Rašalo pagalvėlės ilgalaikiškumas: Archyvinis (atsparus blukimui); Neilgalaikis; Ilgalaikis; Nuplaunamas; Atsparus vandeniui; Nepralaidus vandeniui; Kita
cs: Trvalost inkoustového polštářku: Archivní (odolná proti blednutí); Nepermanentní; Permanentní; Omyvatelná; Voděodolná; Vodotěsná; Jiné
ro-RO: Persistență a tușierei: De arhivă (rezistent la decolorare); Nepermanent; Permanent; Lavabil; Rezistent la apă; Impermeabil; Altele
ko: 잉크 패드 지속성: 보존용(변색 방지); 비영구적; 영구적; 워셔블; 내수성; 방수; 기타
el: Μονιμότητα μελανιού ταμπόν: Αρχειακής ποιότητας (ανθεκτικό στο ξεθώριασμα); Μη μόνιμο; Μόνιμο; Πλενόμενο; Ανθεκτικό στο νερό; Αδιάβροχο; Άλλο
th: ความคงทนของแผ่นหมึก: สำหรับเก็บถาวร (ทนต่อการซีดจาง); ไม่ถาวร; ถาวร; ซักออกได้; กันน้ำ; กันน้ำได้; อื่นๆ
pl: Trwałość poduszki tuszującej: Archiwalny (odporny na blaknięcie); Nietrwały; Trwały; Zmywalny; Odporny na wodę; Wodoodporny; Inne
ja: インクパッド耐久性: アーカイバル (耐退色性); 非パーマネント; パーマネント; ウォッシャブル; 耐水性; 防水性; その他
vi: Độ bền màu của hộp mực dấu: Mực lưu trữ (chống phai màu); Không bền màu; Bền màu; Có thể giặt sạch; Chống nước; Chống thấm nước; Khác
fr: Durabilité de l'encre: Qualité d’archivage (résistant à la décoloration); Non permanent; Permanent; Lavable; Résistant à l’eau; Imperméable; Autre
sk-SK: Trvácnosť atramentového vankúšika: Archívna (odolná voči vyblednutiu); Nestála; Stála; Umývateľná; Vodoodolná; Vodotesná; Iné
nb: Permanenthet for blekkpute: Arkivkvalitet (falmebestandig); Ikke-permanent; Permanent; Vaskbar; Vannbestandig; Vanntett; Annet
fi: Mustetyynyn pysyvyys: Arkistointikelpoinen (haalistumaton); Ei-pysyvä; Pysyvä; Pestävä; Vedenkestävä; Vedenpitävä; Muu
pt-PT: Durabilidade da almofada de tinta: Arquivo (resistente ao desbotamento); Não permanente; Permanente; Lavável; Resistente à água; À prova de água; Outro
de: Haltbarkeit des Stempelkissens: Dokumentenecht (lichtbeständig); Nicht permanent; Permanent; Abwaschbar; Wasserabweisend; Wasserfest; Sonstige
it: Permanenza del tampone per inchiostro: Per archiviazione (resistente allo sbiadimento); Non permanente; Permanente; Lavabile; Resistente all’acqua; Impermeabile; Altro
zh-CN: 印台持久性: 档案级（防褪色）; 非永久性; 永久性; 可水洗; 抗水; 防水; 其他
sl-SI: Obstojnost blazinice za štampiljke: Arhivsko (ne bledi); Neobstojno; Obstojno; Pralno; Vodoodporno; Vodotesno; Drugo
es: Permanencia de la almohadilla de tinta: De archivo (resistente a la decoloración); No permanente; Permanente; Lavable; Resistente al agua; Impermeable; Otro
nl: Inktkussenpermanentie: Archiefwaardig (kleurvast); Niet-permanent; Permanent; Uitwasbaar; Waterbestendig; Watervast; Overige
pt-BR: Permanência da tinta da almofada para carimbo: Arquivamento (resistente ao desbotamento); Não permanente; Permanente; Lavável; Resistente à água; À prova d'água; Outros
sv: Beständighet för stämpeldyna: Arkivbeständig (blekningsresistent); Icke-permanent; Permanent; Tvättbar; Vattentålig; Vattenfast; Övrigt
hu: Tintapárna tartóssága: Archiválási (fakulásálló); Nem tartós; Tartós; Mosható; Vízálló; Vízhatlan; Egyéb
zh-TW: 印台持久性: 檔案級 (抗褪色); 非永久性; 永久性; 可水洗; 抗水; 防水; 其他
ru: Стойкость чернильной подушки: Архивная (устойчивая к выцветанию); Нестойкая; Перманентная; Смываемая; Водостойкая; Водонепроницаемая; Другое
bg-BG: Трайност на мастилената подложка: Архивно (устойчиво на избледняване); Неперманентно; Перманентно; Миещо се; Устойчиво на вода; Водоустойчиво; Други
hr-HR: Trajnost jastučića za tintu: Arhivsko (otporno na blijeđenje); Nije trajno; Trajno; Može se prati; Vodootporno; Vodonepropusno; Ostalo
da: Blækpudens holdbarhed: Arkivbestandig (falmer ikke); Ikke-permanent; Permanent; Vaskbar; Vandafvisende; Vandtæt; Andet
tr: Mürekkep pedi kalıcılığı: Arşivlik (solmaya dayanıklı); Kalıcı olmayan; Kalıcı; Yıkanabilir; Suya dayanıklı; Su geçirmez; Diğer
en: Ink pad permanence: Archival (fade-resistant); Non-permanent; Permanent; Washable; Water-resistant; Waterproof; Other